Nevada, session 83, SB324.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 445A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person shall not sell, offer to sell or distribute for sale
water in a disposable plastic bottle that has a capacity of not more
than 4 liters in any community that abuts the Lake Tahoe
Watershed.
2. The local board of health or health department with
jurisdiction in the county, city or health district shall enforce the
provisions of this section. For any violation of the provisions of
this section, the local board of health or health department, as
applicable, shall:
(a) For a first violation within 1 year, issue a warning to the
person who is in violation of this section.
(b) For a second violation within 1 year, impose a fine of not
more than $100.
(c) For a third violation within 1 year, impose a fine of not
more than $200.
(d) For a fourth or subsequent violation within 1 year, impose
a fine of not more than $500.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Disposable plastic bottle” means a single-use or
disposable item that is made of plastic and used for bottling,
packaging, serving, consuming or transporting water.
(b) “Local board of health” means a county board of health,
city board of health or district board of health.
(c) “Plastic” means a synthetic or semisynthetic material
chemically synthesized by the polymerization of organic
substances that can be molded and shaped into rigid and flexible
forms.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
H
-
*SB324_R1*